Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-831
Human trafficking; labor trafficking or sex trafficking; labor trafficking of a minor or sex trafficking of a minor; prohibited acts; penalties.

(1) Any person who engages in labor trafficking of a minor or sex trafficking of a minor is guilty of a Class IB felony.

(2) Any person who engages in labor trafficking or sex trafficking is guilty of a Class II felony.

(3) Any person, other than a trafficking victim, who knowingly benefits from or participates in a venture which has, as part of the venture, an act that is in violation of this section is guilty of a Class IIA felony.

(4) It is not a defense in a prosecution under this section (a) that consent was given by the minor victim, (b) that the defendant believed that the minor victim gave consent, or (c) that the defendant believed that the minor victim was an adult.

Laws 2006, LB 1086, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB255, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB998, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB294, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB289, § 9.

A defendant's knowledge of the victim's age is not an essential element of the offense of sex trafficking of a minor. State v. Swindle, 300 Neb. 734, 915 N.W.2d 795 (2018).